Utah statutes.
38-1-24.   Cancellation of record -- Penalty.

The claimant of any lien filed as provided herein, on the payment of the amount thereof together with the costs incurred and the fees for cancellation, shall at the request of any person interested in the property charged therewith cause said lien to be canceled of record within 10 days from the request, and upon failure to so cancel his lien within the time aforesaid shall forfeit and pay to the person making the request the sum of $100 per day or actual damages, whichever is greater, until the same shall be canceled, to be recovered in the same manner as other debts.

